Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1115.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1741.1-A. Fund balance limits. (a) Limits.--Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year and each school year thereafter, a cyber charter school may not accumulate any of the following:(1) An estimated ending unreserved, undesignated fund balance that exceeds 8% of total budgeted expenditures.(2) A combined assigned fund balance and committed fund balance that exceeds 4% of total budgeted expenditures.12345678910111213141516171819 (3) A combined assigned, estimated ending unreserved, undesignated and committed fund balance that exceeds 12% of total budgeted expenditures.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assigned fund balance." An amount intended or constrained to be used for a specific purpose as authorized by the governing body of the cyber charter school."Committed fund balance." An amount intended or constrained to be used for a specific purpose as authorized by a committee or individual authorized by the governing body of the cyber charter school."Estimated ending unreserved, undesignated fund balance." The portion of the fund balance which is appropriable for expenditure or not legally or otherwise segregated for a specific or tentative future use, projected for the close of the school year for which a cyber charter school's budget was adopted and held in the general fund accounts of the cyber charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1115PN1237 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021